Mississippi, session 2026, HB764.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. All interrogations conducted by any law enforcement agency shall be recorded on video from the beginning of the interrogation through the end of the interrogation.  The law enforcement agency shall preserve such interrogation video recordings for a minimum of ten (10) years. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.